North Carolina statutes. Chapter 54B. Savings and Loan Associations.
Article 3. Fundamental Changes.
§ 54B-41.
Voluntary dissolution by stockholders or members.

At any annual or special meeting called for such purpose, an association may, by an affirmative vote in person or by proxy of at least two thirds of the total number of shares or votes which all members or stockholders of the association are entitled to cast, resolve to dissolve and liquidate the association and adopt a plan of voluntary dissolution. Upon adoption of such resolution and plan of voluntary dissolution, the members or stockholders shall proceed to elect not more than three liquidators who shall post bond as required by the Commissioner of Banks. The liquidators shall have full power to execute the plan; and the procedure thereafter shall be as follows:

A copy of the resolution certified by the president or secretary of the association, together with the minutes of the meeting of members or stockholders, the plan of liquidation, and an itemized statement of the association’s assets and liabilities sworn to by a majority of its board of directors, shall be filed with the Commissioner of Banks. The minutes of the meeting of members or stockholders shall be certified by the president or secretary of the association, and shall set forth the notice given and the time of mailing thereof, the vote on the resolution and the total number of shares or votes which all members of the association were entitled to cast thereon, and the names of the liquidators elected.

If the Commissioner of Banks finds that the proceedings are in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter, and that the plan of liquidation is not unfair to any person affected, he shall attach his certificate of approval to the plan and shall forward one copy to the liquidators and one copy to the association’s withdrawable account insurance corporation. Once the Commissioner of Banks has approved the resolution and the plan of liquidation it shall thereafter be unlawful for such association to accept any additional withdrawable accounts or additions to withdrawable accounts or make any additional loans, but all its income and receipts in excess of actual expenses of liquidation of the association shall be applied to the discharge of its liabilities.

The liquidator or liquidators so appointed shall be paid a reasonable compensation by the liquidating association subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Banks.

The plan shall become effective upon the recording of the Commissioner of Banks’ certificate of approval in the manner required by this Chapter for the recording of the certificate of incorporation.

The liquidation of the association shall be subject to the supervision and examination of the Commissioner of Banks.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-42.
Rules, regulations and reports of voluntary dissolution.

The Commissioner of Banks shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the dissolution and liquidation of State associations. These rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, provisions with respect to:

The protection and liquidation of assets;

The plan of liquidation;

Notice to file claims;

Claims of members;

Payments of claims and distribution; and

Final distribution and liquidation.

Upon completion of liquidation, the liquidators shall file with the Commissioner of Banks a final report and accounting of the liquidation. The approval of the report by the Commissioner of Banks shall operate as a complete and final discharge of the liquidators, the board of directors, and each member or stockholder in connection with the liquidation of such association. Upon approval of the report, the Commissioner of Banks shall issue a certificate of dissolution of the association and shall record same in the manner required by this Chapter for the recording of certificates of incorporation; and upon such recording, the dissolution shall be effective.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-43.
Stock dividends.

No dividend on stock shall be paid unless the association has the prior written approval of the Commissioner of Banks.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 1983, c. 144, s. 7; 1989, c. 76, s. 9; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-44.
Supervisory mergers, consolidations, conversions, and combination mergers and conversions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, in order to protect the public, including members, depositors and stockholders of a State association, the Commissioner of Banks, upon making a finding that a State association is unable to operate in a safe and sound manner, may authorize or require a short form merger, consolidation, conversion, or combination merger and conversion of the State association, or any other transaction, as to which the finding is made.

The Commissioner of Banks shall promulgate rules and regulations to govern supervisory mergers, consolidations, conversions, and combination mergers and conversions authorized by this section.

History.

1981, c. 670, s. 2; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1238, s. 11; 1985, c. 659, s. 18; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 948, s. 2; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-45.
Interim associations.

Article 2 of this Chapter shall not apply to applications for permission to organize an interim State association so long as the application is approved by the Commissioner of Banks.

Preliminary approval of an application for permission to organize an interim State association shall be conditional upon the Commissioner of Banks’ approval of an application to merge the interim association and an existing stock association or on the Commissioner of Banks’ approval of any other transaction.

The Commissioner of Banks shall promulgate rules and regulations to govern the formation of interim associations authorized by this section.

History.

1985, c. 659, s. 9(b); 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-46.
Conversion of bank to stock association.

Any bank, as defined in G.S. 53C-1-4(4), may convert to a stock association as provided in this section.

Any bank, upon a majority vote of its board of directors, may apply to the Commissioner of Banks for permission to convert to a stock association and for certification of appropriate amendments to the bank’s certificate of incorporation to effect the conversion.

The bank shall submit a plan of conversion as a part of the application to the Commissioner of Banks. The Commissioner of Banks may recommend approval of the plan of conversion with or without amendment. The Commissioner of Banks shall recommend approval of the plan of conversion if upon examination and investigation he finds that:

The resulting stock association will operate in a safe, sound, and prudent manner with adequate capital, liquidity, and earnings prospects;

The directors, officers, and other managerial officials of the bank are qualified by character and financial responsibility to control and operate in a legal and proper manner the stock association proposed to be formed as a result of the conversion;

The interest of the depositors, the creditors, and the public generally will not be jeopardized by the proposed conversion; and

The proposed name will not mislead the public as to the character or purpose of the resulting stock association, and the proposed name is not the same as one already adopted or appropriated by an existing association in this State or so similar as to be likely to mislead the public.

Any action taken by the Commissioner of Banks pursuant to this section shall be subject to review by the Commission which may approve, modify, or disapprove any action taken or recommended by the Commissioner of Banks. The Commission may promulgate rules to govern conversions undertaken pursuant to this section. The requirements for a converting bank shall be no more stringent than those provided by rule or regulation applicable to other FDIC-insured stock associations. The requirements for a converting bank shall be no less stringent than those provided by rule or regulation applicable to other FDIC-insured stock associations, except as may be allowed during transition periods permitted by subdivisions (e)(4) and (h)(2) of this section.

In the absence of the promulgation of rules under subsection (d), the conditions to be met for approval of the application for conversion should include the following:

Condition. The applicant’s general condition must reflect adequate capital, liquidity, reserves, earnings, and asset composition necessary for safe and sound operation of the resulting stock association.

Management. The management and the board of directors must be capable of supervising a sound stock association operation and overseeing the changes that must be accomplished in the conversion from a bank to a stock association.

Public Convenience. The Commission must determine that the conversion will have a positive impact on the convenience of the public and will not substantially reduce the services available to the public in the market area.

Transition. Within a reasonable time after the effective date of the conversion, the resulting stock association must divest itself of all assets and liabilities that do not conform to State banking law or rules. The length of this transition period shall be determined by the Commissioner of Banks and shall be specified when the application for conversion is approved.In evaluating each of these conditions, the Commission shall consider a comparison of the relevant financial ratios of the applicant with the average ratios of North Carolina stock associations of similar asset size. The Commission may not approve a conversion where the applicant presents an undue supervisory concern or has not been operated in a safe and sound manner.

If the Commissioner of Banks approves the plan of conversion, then the bank shall submit the plan to the stockholders as provided in subsection (g). After approval of the plan of conversion, the Commissioner of Banks shall supervise and monitor the conversion process and shall ensure that the conversion is conducted pursuant to law and the bank’s approved plan of conversion.

After lawful notice to the stockholders of the bank and full and fair disclosure of the plan of conversion, the plan must be approved by a majority of the total votes that stockholders of the bank are eligible and entitled to cast. The vote by the stockholders may be in person or by proxy. Following the vote of the stockholders, the bank shall file with the Commissioner of Banks the results of the vote certified by an appropriate officer of the bank. The Commissioner of Banks shall approve the requested conversion and the bank shall file with the Secretary of State amended articles of incorporation with the certificate of the Commissioner of Banks attached. The conversion of the bank to a stock association shall be effective upon this filing.

The Commissioner of Banks may authorize the resulting stock association to do the following:

Wind up any activities legally engaged in by the bank at the time of conversion but not permitted to stock associations.

Retain for a transitional period any assets and deposit liabilities legally held by the bank at the effective date of the conversion that may not be held by stock associations.

The length, terms, and conditions of the transitional periods under subdivisions (1) and (2) are subject to the discretion of the Commissioner of Banks, but may not exceed five years after the effective date of the conversion.

Upon conversion of a bank to a stock association, the legal existence of the bank does not terminate, and the resulting stock association is a continuation of the bank. The conversion shall be a mere change in identity or form of organization. All rights, liabilities, obligations, interest, and relations of whatever kind of the bank shall continue and remain in the resulting stock association. Except as may be authorized during a transitional period by the Commissioner of Banks pursuant to subsection (h), a stock association resulting from the conversion of a bank shall have only those rights, powers, and duties which are authorized for stock associations by the laws of this State and the United States. All actions and legal proceedings to which the bank was a party prior to conversion shall be unaffected by the conversion and proceed as if the conversion had not taken place.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 845, s. 2; 2001-193, s. 16; 2012-56, s. 38.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-56, s. 38, effective October 1, 2012, substituted “G.S. 53C-1-4(4)” for “G.S. 53-1” in subsection (a).

§ 54B-47.
Merger of banks and associations.

Any State association, upon a majority vote of its board of directors, may apply to the Commissioner of Banks for permission to merge with any bank, as defined in G.S. 53C-1-4(4).

The State association shall submit a plan of merger as a part of the application to the Commissioner of Banks. The Commissioner of Banks may recommend approval of the plan of merger with or without amendment.If he approves the plan, then the plan shall be submitted to the stockholders or members as provided in the next subsection. If he refuses to approve the plan, he shall state his objections in writing and give the merging association an opportunity to amend the plan to obviate such objections or to appeal his decision to the commission.

After lawful notice to the stockholders or members of the association and full and fair disclosure, the substance of the plan must be approved by a majority of the total votes which stockholders or members of the association are eligible and entitled to cast. Such a vote by the stockholders or members may be in person or by proxy. Following the vote of the stockholders or members, the results of the vote certified by an appropriate officer of the association shall be filed with the Commissioner of Banks. The Commissioner of Banks shall then either approve or disapprove the requested merger.

The Commissioner of Banks may promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to govern such mergers.

History.

1991, c. 707, s. 7; 2001-193, s. 16; 2012-56, s. 39.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-56, s. 39, effective October 1, 2012, substituted “G.S. 53C-1-4(4)” for “G.S. 53-1” in subsection (a).

§ 54B-48.

Reserved for future codification purposes.